Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.360

Lobbyist. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either on the person's own or another's behalf.

[ 2024 c 164 s 236.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.